California statutes. Civil Code
Unless the judgment is paid within 30 days from the date it becomes final, the plaintiff may sell the baggage and property at public auction to the highest bidder, after giving notice of the sale by publication. The notice shall contain the name of the debtor, the amount due, a brief description of the property to be sold, and the time and place of sale, in the manner required by Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county in which the premises are situated. A copy of the notice shall be mailed, at least 15 days prior to the date of sale, to the tenant or guest at his or her residence or other known address, and if not
 known, to the tenant or guest at the place where the premises are situated. After satisfying the lien out of the proceeds of the sale, together with any reasonable costs that may have been incurred in enforcing the lien, the balance of the proceeds of the sale, if any, which have not been claimed by the tenant or guest shall, within 30 days from the date of the sale, be paid into the treasury of the county in which the sale took place. If that balance is not claimed by the owner thereof, or his legal representative, within one year thereafter, by making application to the treasurer or other official designated by the county, it shall be paid into the general fund of the county. Any sale conducted pursuant to this section shall be a bar to any action against the plaintiff for the recovery of the baggage or property, or of the value thereof, or for any damages arising out of the failure of the tenant or guest to receive the baggage or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.25.

Where the property taken is claimed by a third person, the rules and proceedings applicable in cases of third-party claims under Division 4 (commencing with Section 720.010) of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.5.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.27.

The facts stated in each affidavit filed pursuant to this article shall be set forth with particularity. Except where matters are specifically permitted by this article to be shown by information and belief, each affidavit shall show affirmatively that the affiant, if sworn as a witness, can testify competently to the facts stated therein. The affiant may be any person, whether or not a party to this action, who has knowledge of the facts. A verified complaint that satisfies the requirements of this section may be used in lieu of, or in addition to, an ordinary affidavit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.28.

The judicial duties to be performed under this article are “subordinate judicial duties” within the meaning of Section 22 of Article VI of the California Constitution, and may be performed by appointed officers such as court commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861a.

Keepers of furnished and unfurnished apartment houses, apartments, cottages, or bungalow courts shall have a lien upon the baggage and other property of value belonging to their tenants or guests, and upon all the right, title and interest of their tenants or guests in and to all property in the possession of such tenants or guests which may be in such apartment house, apartment, cottage, or bungalow court, for the proper charges due from such tenants or guests, for their accommodation, rent, services, meals, and such extras as are furnished at their request, and for all moneys expended for them, at their
 request, and for the costs of enforcing such lien.

Such lien may be enforced only after final judgment in an action brought to recover such charges or moneys. During the pendency of the proceeding, the plaintiff may take possession of such baggage and property upon an order issued by the court, where it appears to the satisfaction of the court from an affidavit filed by or on behalf of the plaintiff that the baggage or property is about to be destroyed, substantially devalued, or removed from the premises. Ten days written notice of the hearing on the motion for such order shall be served on the defendant and shall inform the defendant that the defendant may file affidavits on the defendant’s behalf and present testimony in the defendant’s behalf and that if the defendant fails to appear the plaintiff will apply to the court for such order. The plaintiff shall file an undertaking with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the court, in such sum as may be
 fixed by the court.

Upon such order, the plaintiff shall have the right to enter peaceably the unfurnished apartment house, apartment, cottage, or bungalow court used by the guest or tenant without liability to the guest or tenant, including any possible claim of liability for conversion, trespass, or forcible entry. The plaintiff shall have the same duties and liabilities as a depository for hire as to property which the plaintiff takes into possession. An entry shall be considered peaceable when accomplished with a key or passkey or through an unlocked door during the hours between sunrise and sunset. Unless the judgment shall be paid within 30 days from the date when it becomes final, the plaintiff may sell the baggage and property, at public auction to the highest bidder, after giving notice of such sale by publication of a notice containing the name of the debtor, the amount due, a brief description of the property to be sold, and the time and place of such
 sale, pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code in the county in which said apartment house, apartment, cottage, or bungalow court is situated, and after by mailing, at least 15 days prior to the date of sale, a copy of such notice addressed to such tenant or guest at the residence or other known address of the tenant or guest, and if not known, such notice shall be addressed to the tenant or guest at the place where such apartment house, apartment, cottage, or bungalow court is situated; and, after satisfying such lien out of the proceeds of such sale, together with any reasonable costs, that may have been incurred in enforcing said lien, the residue of said proceeds of sale, if any, shall, upon demand made within six months after such sale, be paid to such tenant or guest; and if not demanded within six months from the date of such sale, said residue, if any, shall be paid into the treasury of the county in which such sale took place; and if the same be not claimed by the owner thereof, or the
 owner’s legal representative within one year thereafter, it shall be paid into the general fund of the county; and such sale shall be a perpetual bar to any action against said keeper for the recovery of such baggage or property, or of the value thereof, or for any damages, growing out of the failure of such tenant or guest to receive such baggage or property.

When the baggage and property are not in the possession of the keeper as provided herein, such lien shall be enforced only in the manner provided for enforcement of a money judgment.

Any property which is exempt from enforcement of a money judgment is not subject to the lien provided for in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 10.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1862.5.

Whenever any personal property has heretofore been found in or deposited with, or is hereafter found in or deposited with any licensed hospital and has remained or shall remain unclaimed for a period of 180 days following the departure of the owner from the hospital, such hospital may proceed to sell the same at public auction, and out of the proceeds of such sale may retain the charges for storage, if any, the reasonable expenses of sale thereof and all sums due the hospital from the last known owner. No such sale shall be made until the expiration of four weeks from the time written notice of such sale is given to the last
 known owner. Said notice shall contain a description of each item of personal property to be sold, the name of the last owner, the name of the hospital and the time and place of sale and may be sent by regular mail, postage prepaid, to the last known owner at his last known address. In case there should be any balance from such sale after the deductions herein provided for, and such balance shall not be claimed by the rightful owner or his legal representative within one week of said sale, the same shall be paid into the treasury of the county wherein said hospital is located; and if the same be not claimed by the owner thereof, or his legal representative within one year thereafter, the same shall be paid into the general fund of said county. Proceedings in substantial compliance with this section shall exonerate the hospital from any liability for property so sold. This section shall not be construed as limiting or in any way amending any other provision of law limiting the liabilities of any licensed
 hospital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 810.)
-------------------------------------------

1863.

(a) Every keeper of a hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse, shall post in a conspicuous place in the office or public room, and in every bedroom of said hotel, boardinghouse, inn, or lodginghouse, a printed copy of this section, and a statement of rate or range of rates by the day for lodging.

(b) No charge or sum shall be collected or received for any greater sum than is specified in subdivision (a). For any violation of this subdivision, the offender shall forfeit to the injured party one hundred dollars ($100) or three times the
 amount of the sum charged in excess of what he is entitled to, whichever is greater. There shall be no forfeiture under this subdivision unless notice be given of the overcharge to such keeper within 30 days after payment of such charges and such keeper shall fail or refuse to make proper adjustment of such overcharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 826.)
-------------------------------------------

1864.

Any person or entity, including a person employed by a real estate broker, who, on behalf of another or others, solicits or arranges, or accepts reservations or money, or both, for transient occupancies described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1940, in a dwelling unit in a common interest development, as defined in Section 4100, in a dwelling unit in an apartment building or complex, or in a single-family home, shall do each of the following:

(a) Prepare and maintain, in accordance with a written agreement with the owner, complete and accurate records and books of account, kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of all reservations made and money received and spent with respect to each dwelling unit. All money received shall be kept in a trust account maintained for the benefit of owners of the dwelling units.

(b) Render, monthly, to each owner of the dwelling unit, or to that owner’s designee, an accounting for each month in which there are any deposits or disbursements on behalf of that owner, however, in no event shall this accounting be rendered any less frequently than quarterly.

(c) Make all records and books of account with respect to a dwelling unit available, upon reasonable advance notice, for inspection and copying by the
 dwelling unit’s owner. The records shall be maintained for a period of at least three years.

(d) Comply fully with all collection, payment, and recordkeeping requirements of a transient occupancy tax ordinance, if any, applicable to the occupancy.

(e) In no event shall any activities described in this section subject the person or entity performing those activities in any manner to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. However, a real estate licensee subject to this section may satisfy the requirements of this section by compliance with the Real Estate Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 37.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

1865.

(a) For purposes of this section, “hotel” means any hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other similar transient lodging establishment, but it shall not include any residential hotel as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code. “Innkeeper” means the owner or operator of a hotel, or the duly authorized agent or employee of the owner or operator.

(b) For purposes of this section, “guest” means, and is specifically limited to, an occupant of a hotel whose
 occupancy is exempt, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1940, from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3.

(c) In addition to, and not in derogation of, any other provision of law, every innkeeper shall have the right to evict a guest in the manner specified in this subdivision if the guest refuses or otherwise fails to fully depart the guest room at or before the innkeeper’s posted checkout time on the date agreed to by the guest, but only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) If the guest is provided written notice, at the time that he or she was received and provided accommodations by the innkeeper, that the innkeeper needs that guest’s room to accommodate an arriving person with a contractual right thereto, and that if the guest fails to fully depart at the time agreed to the innkeeper may enter the guest’s guest room, take
 possession of the guest’s property, re-key the door to the guest room, and make the guest room available to a new guest. The written notice shall be signed by the guest.

(2) At the time that the innkeeper actually undertakes to evict the guest as specified in this subdivision, the innkeeper in fact has a contractual obligation to provide the guest room to an arriving person.

In the above cases, the innkeeper may enter the guest’s guest room, take possession of the guest’s property, re-key the door to the guest room, and make the guest room available to a new guest. The evicted guest shall be entitled to immediate possession of his or her property upon request therefor, subject to the rights of the innkeeper pursuant to Sections 1861 to 1861.28, inclusive.

(d) As pertains to a minor, the rights of an innkeeper include, but are not limited
 to, the following:

(1) Where a minor unaccompanied by an adult seeks accommodations, the innkeeper may require a parent or guardian of the minor, or another responsible adult, to assume, in writing, full liability for any and all proper charges and other obligations incurred by the minor for accommodations, food and beverages, and other services provided by or through the innkeeper, as well as for any and all injuries or damage caused by the minor to any person or property.

(2) Where a minor is accompanied by an adult, the innkeeper may require the adult to agree, in writing, not to leave any minor 12 years of age or younger unattended on the innkeeper’s premises at any time during their stay, and to control the minor’s behavior during their stay so as to preserve the peace and quiet of the innkeeper’s other guests and to prevent any injury to any person and damage to any
 property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1866.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Camping cabin” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Campsite” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.9 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Guest” is interchangeable with “occupant” and has the same meaning as used in Chapter 2.6
 (commencing with Section 799.20) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(4) “Lot” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.23 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(6) “Occupant” is interchangeable with “guest” and has the same meaning as used in Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 799.20) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(7) “Park trailer” has the same meaning as in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) “Recreational vehicle” has the same meaning as in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) “Site” means the campsite, camping
 cabin, lot, or rental unit.

(10) “Special occupancy park” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.43 of the Health and Safety Code.

(11) “Tent” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.49 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the park management of a special occupancy park shall have the right to evict a guest if the guest refuses or otherwise fails to fully depart from the campsite, camping cabin, lot, or other rental unit at the park management’s posted checkout time on the date agreed to by the guest, but only if the following conditions are met:

(A) The guest is provided with written notice, at the time that he or she was provided accommodations by the park management, that the park
 management needs that guest’s campsite, camping cabin, lot, or rental unit to accommodate an arriving person with a contractual right thereto, and that if the guest fails to fully depart at the time agreed to, the park management may take possession of the guest’s property left in the site, subject to the limits of paragraph (2), including any tent, park trailer, or recreational vehicle, and make the campsite, camping cabin, lot, or rental unit available to new guests. The written notice shall be signed by the guest.

(B) (i) At the time that the park management actually undertakes to evict the guest as specified in this subdivision, the park management has a contractual obligation to provide the guest’s campsite, camping cabin, lot, or rental unit to an arriving person and there are no other substantially similar campsites, camping cabins, lots, or rental units available for the arriving person.

(ii) Subject to the same requirements described in subparagraph (i), a guest may be provided with the notice described in subparagraph (A) subsequent to the time he or she was provided accommodations by park management, if the notice is provided at least 24 hours prior to the guest’s scheduled checkout time. If park management provides a notice under this subparagraph in bad faith or with the knowledge that the contractual obligation is not a bona fide obligation, it shall be liable to the evicted guest for actual damages, plus a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(C) At the time that the park management actually undertakes to evict the guest as specified in this subdivision, the park management offers another campsite, camping cabin, lot, or rental unit to the guest, if one is available.

(2) In addition
 to the requirements of paragraph (1), in order for management to remove a recreational vehicle or motor vehicle, the park management shall do all of the following:

(A) Management shall have an oral, face-to-face communication with the registered guest after the guest has held over that does all of the following:

(i) Alerts the guest that he or she is in violation of the terms of the reservation because he or she has failed to depart the site at the agreed-upon time.

(ii) Reminds the guest that failure to remove a recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or any other property from the space within two hours may result in the park management removing the recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or any other property.

(iii) Discloses that the cost of towing a
 recreational vehicle or motor vehicle is substantial and that these costs will be incurred by the guest.

(iv) Identifies another location in the park to which the guest may temporarily move his or her recreational vehicle or motor vehicle.

(B) The park management gives the guest two hours after the park management has communicated with the guest, pursuant to subparagraph (A), to remove the guest’s recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or other property from the site.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if the conditions specified in subdivision (b) are met, the park management may take possession of the guest’s property left at the site and have the guest’s recreational vehicle or motor vehicle towed from the special occupancy park and make the guest’s campsite, camping cabin, lot, or rental unit available to a
 new guest. Park management may enter a campsite, camping cabin, park trailer, lot, or rental unit owned by the park management to take possession of the guest’s possessions. The evicted guest shall be entitled to immediate possession of his or her property upon request, subject to the enforcement rights of the park management, which are the same as those accorded to a hotel, motel, inn, boarding house, or lodging housekeeper, pursuant to Sections 1861 to 1861.28, inclusive. If a guest’s recreational vehicle or motor vehicle has been towed from the premises, the guest shall be entitled to immediate possession of his or her vehicle upon request, subject to the conditions of the towing company.

(d) When the park management moves or causes the removal of a guest’s recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or other property, the management and the individual or entity that removes the recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or other property shall exercise
 reasonable and ordinary care in removing the recreational vehicle, motor vehicle, or other property.

(e) This section does not apply to a manufactured home, as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code, or a mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) In the event that a guest is incapable of removing his or her recreational vehicle or motor vehicle from the lot because of: (1) a physical incapacity, (2) the recreational vehicle or motor vehicle is not motorized and cannot be moved by the guest’s vehicle, or (3) the recreational vehicle or motor vehicle is inoperable due to mechanical difficulties, the guest shall be provided with 72 hours in which to remove the vehicle. If the guest has not removed the vehicle within 72 hours, park management may remove the vehicle without further notice.

(g) As pertains to a minor, the rights of guests include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) If a minor who is unaccompanied by an adult seeks accommodations, the park management may require a parent or guardian of the minor, or another responsible adult, to assume, in writing, full liability for any and all proper charges and other obligations incurred by the minor for accommodations, food and beverages, and other services provided by or through the park management, as well as for any and all injuries or damage caused by the minor to any person or property.

(2) If a minor is accompanied by an adult, the park management may require the adult to agree, in writing, not to leave any minor 12 years of age or younger unattended on the park management’s premises at any time during their stay, and to control the minor’s
 behavior during their stay so as to preserve the peace and quiet of the other guests and to prevent any injury to any person and damage to any property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 530, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1867.

(a) The park management of a special occupancy park may require a guest to move from a space in the special occupancy park to a different space in the special occupancy park if an imminent danger is present, as determined by the park management. If possible, the park management shall offer to return the guest to his or her original space once the park management has determined that the imminent danger is removed or resolved.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) “Imminent danger” means a danger that poses an immediate and likely risk to the health or safety of a guest or guests in the special occupancy park.

(2) “Space” means any of the following:

(A) “Camping cabin,” as defined in Section 18862.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) “Campsite,” as defined in Section 18862.9 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) “Lot,” as defined in Section 18862.23 of the Health and Safety Code, or other rental unit.

(3) “Special occupancy park” has the same meaning as in Section 18862.43 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 530, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Deposit for Exchange [1878. - 1878.]

1878.

A deposit for exchange transfers to the depositary the title to the thing deposited, and creates between him and the depositor the relation of debtor and creditor merely.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Private Bulk Storage of Grain [1880. - 1881.2.]

1880.

This chapter may be cited as the Private Bulk Grain Storage
Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Grain” includes barley, corn, flax, hay, grain sorghums, oats, rice, rye, and wheat.

(b) “Seller” means a producer of grain who continues to store grain after sale thereof by him in storage facilities owned, operated, or controlled by him. 

(c) “Storage facilities” means any bin, building, elevator, protected enclosure, or other structure owned, operated, or controlled by the
seller of the grain stored therein.

(d) “Private bulk storage” means the storage of grain in storage facilities after sale of such grain by a seller.

(e) “Buyer” means a purchaser of grain which is thereafter stored in private bulk storage, and includes the assigns and successors in interest of such buyer.

(f) “Bill of sale” means a written instrument, conforming to the requirements of this chapter, which evidences a transfer of grain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.2.

The seller shall conspicuously mark on all storage facilities “private bulk storage only” and with a designating number on each such facility and such markings shall be maintained at all times during which grain remains in private bulk storage therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.3.

Grain in private bulk storage facilities may be sold in conformity with this chapter by bill of sale without delivery and no provision of Section 3440 of this code or of any other law requiring delivery or actual and continued change of possession shall be applicable to grain so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.4.

Upon sale of grain which is to remain in private bulk storage the seller shall execute and deliver to the buyer a bill of sale which shall contain all of the following:

(a) The date and place where made.

(b) The names of the seller and the buyer.

(c) A statement of the estimated quantity and kind of grain.

(d) A statement of the location and
designating numbers of the storage facilities in which the grain is stored.

(e) A statement of the price per unit and a statement of the amount received by the seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.5.

The bill of sale may contain other provisions, including reference to or provision for any one or more of the following:

(a) Provision that the total price is based upon the estimated weight and that the total price may be adjusted in accordance with the outturn weight.

(b) A statement that the buyer may have free use of the designated storage facilities until a specified date and that any extension beyond the specified date granted by seller must be endorsed under the
signature of seller on the bill of sale.

(c) A statement that seller has the legal right to extend to buyer the use of designated storage facilities.

(d) A statement that actual possession of the grain by the buyer is to be taken on board trucks at the storage facility, or on railroad cars, or in the storage facility, or as may be agreed upon.

(e) A statement that if actual possession be not taken within the time specified, due to any cause not chargeable to seller, the seller may consign the same at buyer’s risk and expense to a specified destination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.6.

Execution and delivery by a seller of a bill of sale shall pass seller’s title to the grain covered thereby to the buyer and such title passes to the assignees of the buyer upon further endorsement and delivery of the bill of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.7.

Upon the issuance of any such bill of sale, the seller shall immediately post upon the storage facilities containing the grain a notice in substantially the following form:
“Notice of Sale
On this ____ day of ____, 19__, grain in this storage facility numbered ____, estimated to be ____ bushels of ____ (designating the kind of grain) was transferred and sold as follows:

Name of Seller ____ Name of original Buyer ____

Address of Seller ____ Address of Buyer ____

Grain to be removed by buyer on or before ____, 19__,
(If date extended such fact and the date to which extended must appear on the notice).” 
Such notice shall be maintained by seller in a conspicuous place upon the storage facility at all times during which the grain involved continues to be stored therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.8.

No delivery shall be made of any portion of the grain so privately stored unless the bill of sale therefor is presented to the seller, or other person in charge of the storage facility, and the amount of grain so delivered plainly endorsed upon the bill of sale; but this provision shall not apply to any consignment of the grain by the seller to the buyer upon the expiration of the time for delivery specified in the bill of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1880.9.

The presentment of the bill of sale by the holder to seller shall be presumptive evidence that the person presenting it is entitled to delivery of the grain described therein unless the seller has knowledge of facts or circumstances sufficient to place him on notice that the possession of the instrument by such person is unlawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.

If any grain in private bulk storage is not removed or delivered on or before the original date of delivery specified in the bill of sale and in the notice of sale, it shall be lawful for the seller to continue to store such grain to the order of the buyer upon such terms as may be agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.1.

A seller who shall willfully fail to comply with the requirements of notice and posting as provided for in Section 1880.2 or in Section 1880.7 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both. No sale of grain shall be invalidated by reason of any lack or irregularity in connection with such notice or posting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 66.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.2.

The storage of grain pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute the depositary a warehouseman or storer of goods for hire and no storage facility shall be deemed to constitute a warehouse or public place of storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1944, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3.5. UTILITY SERVICES [1882. - 1882.6.]

1882.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern the construction of this title:

(a) “Customer” means the person in whose name a utility service is provided.

(b) “Divert” means to change the intended course or path of electricity, gas, or water without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(c) “Person” means any individual, a partnership,
 firm, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(d) “Reconnection” means the commencement of utility service to a customer or other person after service has been lawfully discontinued by the utility.

(e) “Tamper” means to rearrange, injure, alter, interfere with, or otherwise to prevent from performing normal or customary function.

(f) “Utility” means any electrical, gas, or water corporation as those terms are defined in the Public Utilities Code and includes any electrical, gas, or water system operated by any public agency.

(g) “Utility service” means the provision of electricity, gas, water, or any other service or commodity furnished by the utility for compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.1.

A utility may bring a civil action for damages against any person who commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, abets, or attempts any of the following acts:

(a) Diverts, or causes to be diverted, utility services by any means whatsoever.

(b) Makes, or causes to be made, any connection or reconnection with property owned or used by the utility to provide utility service without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(c) Prevents any utility meter, or other device used in determining the charge for utility services, from accurately performing its measuring function by tampering or
 by any other means.

(d) Tampers with any property owned or used by the utility to provide utility services.

(e) Uses or receives the direct benefit of all, or a portion, of the utility service with knowledge of, or reason to believe that, the diversion, tampering, or unauthorized connection existed at the time of the use, or that the use or receipt, was without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(f) (1) Tampers with a fire hydrant, fire hydrant meter, or fire detector check, or
 connects to, diverts water from, or causes water to be diverted from, a fire hydrant without authorization from the utility that owns the fire hydrant.

(2) A public agency having firefighting or emergency response responsibilities during a fire, or a qualified insurance resource, as defined in Section 1139 of the Labor Code, with approval from incident command or the authority having jurisdiction over the active fire incident, shall be considered to have authorization from the utility that owns the fire hydrant during an active fire incident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 540, Sec. 2.   (SB 394)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.2.

In any civil action brought pursuant to Section 1882.1, the utility may recover as damages three times the amount of actual damages, if any, plus the cost of the suit and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 981, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.3.

There is a rebuttable presumption that there is a violation of Section 1882.1 if either of the following occurs:

(a) On premises controlled by the customer or by the person using or receiving the direct benefit of utility service, including through the use of a vehicle, there is either, or both, of the following:

(1) Any instrument, apparatus, or device primarily designed to be used to obtain utility service without paying the full lawful charge for the utility service.

(2) A meter that has been altered, tampered with, or bypassed so as to cause no measurement or inaccurate
 measurement of utility services.

(b) A person tampers with or uses a fire hydrant, fire hydrant meter, or fire detector check without authorization to obtain water and without paying the full lawful charge of the water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 540, Sec. 3.   (SB 394)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.4.

A utility may, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, bring an action to enjoin and restrain any of the acts specified in Section 1882.1.

The utility may, in the same action, seek damages for any of the acts specified in Section 1882.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 981, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.5.

It is not a necessary prerequisite to an action pursuant to Section 1882.4 that the utility have suffered, or be threatened with, monetary damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 981, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.6.

Any damages recovered pursuant to this title in excess of the actual damages sustained by the utility may be taken into account by the Public Utilities Commission or other applicable ratemaking agency in establishing utility rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 981, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4. LOAN [1884. - 1923.10.]



  CHAPTER 1. Loan for Use [1884. - 1896.]

1884.

A loan for use is a contract by which one gives to another the temporary possession and use of personal property, and the latter agrees to return the same thing to him at a future time, without reward for its use.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1885.

A loan for use does not transfer the title to the thing; and all its increase during the period of the loan belongs to the lender.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1886.

A borrower for use must use great care for the preservation in safety and in good condition of the thing lent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1887.

One who borrows a living animal for use, must treat it with great kindness, and provide everything necessary and suitable for it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1888.

A borrower for use is bound to have and to exercise such skill in the care of the thing lent as he causes the lender to believe him to possess.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1889.

A borrower for use must repair all deteriorations or injuries to the thing lent, which are occasioned by his negligence, however slight.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1890.

The borrower of a thing for use may use it for such purposes only as the lender might reasonably anticipate at the time of lending.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1891.

The borrower of a thing for use must not part with it to a third person, without the consent of the lender.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1892.

The borrower of a thing for use must bear all its expenses during the loan, except such as are necessarily incurred by him to preserve it from unexpected and unusual injury. For such expenses he is entitled to compensation from the lender, who may, however, exonerate himself by surrendering the thing to the borrower.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1893.
